vi: Tính năng hỗ trợ tiếp cận: Tuân thủ ADA; Tay vịn/thanh nắm; Hệ thống treo hạ thấp; Sàn thấp; Chỗ ngồi ưu tiên; Thang nâng xe lăn; Dốc cho xe lăn; Hệ thống cố định xe lăn; Cửa vào rộng; Khác
ro-RO: Funcții de accesibilitate: Conform ADA; Balustrade/bare de susținere; Suspensie cu lăsare pe o parte; Podea coborâtă; Locuri prioritare; Lift pentru scaune cu rotile; Rampă pentru scaune cu rotile; Sistem de fixare pentru scaune cu rotile; Ușă de acces lată; Altele
sl-SI: Funkcije za dostopnost: Skladno z ADA; Oprijemala/ročaji; Vzmetenje s funkcijo spuščanja; Nizki pod; Prednostni sedeži; Dvigalo za invalidske vozičke; Klansčina za invalidske vozičke; Sistem za pritrditev invalidskega vozička; Široka vhodna vrata; Drugo
de: Mobilitätshilfen: ADA-konform; Handläufe/Haltegriffe; Kneeling-System; Niederflur; Vorrangige Sitzplätze; Rollstuhllift; Rollstuhlrampe; Rollstuhlrückhaltesystem; Breite Eingangstür; Andere
nb: Tilgjengelighetsfunksjoner: ADA-kompatibel; Håndløpere / støttehåndtak; Senkefunksjon; Lavgulv; Prioriterte sitteplasser; Rullestolheis; Rullestolrampe; Sikringssystem for rullestol; Bred inngangsdør; Annet
en: Accessibility features: ADA compliant; Handrails/grab bars; Kneeling suspension; Low-floor; Priority seating; Wheelchair lift; Wheelchair ramp; Wheelchair securement system; Wide entry door; Other
ja: アクセシビリティ機能: ADA準拠; 手すり/グラブバー; ニーリングサスペンション; 低床; 優先席; 車椅子用リフト; 車椅子用スロープ; 車椅子固定システム; 幅広の入口ドア; その他
it: Funzionalità di accessibilità: Conforme ADA; Corrimano/maniglioni; Sospensioni kneeling; Pianale ribassato; Posti prioritari; Sollevatore per sedia a rotelle; Rampa per sedia a rotelle; Sistema di ancoraggio per sedia a rotelle; Porta d'ingresso ampia; Altro
hu: Akadálymentességi funkciók: ADA-megfelelő; Kapaszkodók/fogantyúk; Leereszthető felfüggesztés; Alacsonypadlós; Kiemelt ülőhely; Kerekesszék-emelő; Kerekesszékes rámpa; Kerekesszék-rögzítő rendszer; Széles bejárati ajtó; Egyéb
da: Tilgængelighedsfunktioner: ADA-kompatibel; Gelændere/støttegreb; Niveausænkning; Lavt gulv; Prioriterede siddepladser; Kørestolslift; Kørestolsrampe; Fastspændingssystem til kørestol; Bred indgangsdør; Andre
zh-CN: 无障碍功能: 符合 ADA 标准; 扶手/抓杆; 侧倾悬挂; 低地板; 优先座位; 轮椅升降机; 轮椅坡道; 轮椅固定系统; 宽入口门; 其他
nl: Toegankelijkheidsfuncties: ADA-conform; Leuningen/handgrepen; Knielsysteem; Lage vloer; Prioriteitsstoelen; Rolstoellift; Rolstoeloprit; Rolstoelbevestigingssysteem; Brede toegangsdeur; Overig
el: Λειτουργίες προσβασιμότητας: Συμβατό με ADA; Χειρολισθήρες/λαβές στήριξης; Ανάρτηση χαμηλώματος; Χαμηλό δάπεδο; Καθίσματα προτεραιότητας; Αναβατόριο αμαξιδίου; Ράμπα αμαξιδίου; Σύστημα ασφάλισης αμαξιδίου; Φαρδιά πόρτα εισόδου; Άλλο
ko: 접근성 기능: ADA 준수; 손잡이/안전바; 닐링 서스펜션; 저상; 교통약자석; 휠체어 리프트; 휠체어 경사로; 휠체어 고정 시스템; 넓은 출입문; 기타
fi: Esteettömyysominaisuudet: ADA-yhteensopiva; Käsijohteet/tukikahvat; Niaustoiminto; Matalalattia; Etuoikeutetut istumapaikat; Pyörätuolinostin; Pyörätuoliluiska; Pyörätuolin kiinnitysjärjestelmä; Leveä sisäänkäyntiovi; Muu
pt-BR: Recursos de acessibilidade: Em conformidade com a ADA; Corrimãos/barras de apoio; Suspensão de rebaixamento; Piso baixo; Assentos prioritários; Elevador para cadeira de rodas; Rampa para cadeira de rodas; Sistema de fixação de cadeira de rodas; Porta de entrada larga; Outros
es: Funciones de accesibilidad: Cumple con la ADA; Pasamanos/barras de apoyo; Suspensión con inclinación; Piso bajo; Asientos prioritarios; Elevador para silla de ruedas; Rampa para silla de ruedas; Sistema de sujeción para silla de ruedas; Puerta de entrada ancha; Otro
pl: Funkcje dostępności: Zgodne z ADA; Poręcze/uchwyty; Zawieszenie z funkcją przyklęku; Niskopodłogowy; Miejsca uprzywilejowane; Winda dla wózków inwalidzkich; Rampa dla wózków inwalidzkich; System mocowania wózków inwalidzkich; Szerokie drzwi wejściowe; Inne
pt-PT: Caraterísticas de acessibilidade: Em conformidade com a ADA; Corrimões/barras de apoio; Suspensão com rebaixamento; Piso rebaixado; Assentos prioritários; Elevador para cadeiras de rodas; Rampa para cadeiras de rodas; Sistema de fixação para cadeiras de rodas; Porta de entrada larga; Outro
sv: Tillgänglighetsfunktioner: ADA-anpassad; Handledare/stödhandtag; Nigningsfjädring; Låggolv; Prioriterade sittplatser; Rullstolslift; Rullstolsramp; Fastspänningssystem för rullstol; Bred entrédörr; Övrigt
lt-LT: Pritaikymo neįgaliesiems ypatybės: Atitinka ADA reikalavimus; Turėklai / atramos; Pritūpianti pakaba; Žemos grindys; Prioritetinės sėdimos vietos; Neįgaliųjų vežimėlių keltuvas; Neįgaliųjų vežimėlių rampa; Neįgaliųjų vežimėlių tvirtinimo sistema; Plačios įėjimo durys; Kita
ru: Характеристики доступности: Соответствие стандартам ADA; Поручни/ручки; Подвеска с функцией наклона; Низкий пол; Приоритетные места; Подъемник для инвалидных колясок; Пандус для инвалидных колясок; Система крепления инвалидной коляски; Широкая входная дверь; Другое
th: คุณสมบัติเพื่อการเข้าถึง: เป็นไปตามมาตรฐาน ADA; ราวจับ/ราวพยุง; ระบบกันสะเทือนแบบปรับลดระดับได้; พื้นชานต่ำ; ที่นั่งสำรองพิเศษ; ลิฟต์ยกรถวีลแชร์; ทางลาดรถวีลแชร์; ระบบล็อกรถวีลแชร์; ประตูทางเข้ากว้าง; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Funkcie prístupnosti: V súlade so štandardmi ADA; Madlá/zábradlia; Znižovanie podvozku (kneeling); Nízkopodlažné; Vyhradené miesta na sedenie; Plošina pre invalidné vozíky; Rampa pre invalidné vozíky; Systém upevnenia invalidného vozíka; Široké vstupné dvere; Iné
zh-TW: 無障礙功能: 符合 ADA 標準; 扶手/安全抓桿; 側傾懸吊系統; 低底盤; 博愛座; 輪椅升降設備; 輪椅坡道; 輪椅固定系統; 加寬入口車門; 其他
cs: Funkce pro usnadnění přístupu: V souladu s předpisy ADA; Madla/držadla; Systém snižování podvozku (kneeling); Nízkopodlažní; Vyhrazená sedadla; Plošina pro invalidní vozíky; Rampa pro invalidní vozíky; Zádržný systém pro invalidní vozíky; Široké vstupní dveře; Ostatní
fr: Fonctionnalités d’accessibilité: Conforme aux normes d’accessibilité; Mains courantes/barres d’appui; Suspension à agenouillement; Plancher surbaissé; Places prioritaires; Élévateur pour fauteuil roulant; Rampe pour fauteuil roulant; Système d’ancrage pour fauteuil roulant; Porte d’entrée large; Autre
bg-BG: Функции за достъпност: Съвместим с ADA; Парапети/ръкохватки; Снижаващо се окачване; Нисък под; Места с предимство; Платформа за инвалидни колички; Рампа за инвалидни колички; Система за закрепване на инвалидни колички; Широка входна врата; Други
hr-HR: Značajke pristupačnosti: U skladu s ADA standardima; Rukohvati / drške za pridržavanje; Ovjes sa spuštanjem; Niski pod; Sjedala s prednošću; Dizalo za invalidska kolica; Rampa za invalidska kolica; Sustav za pričvršćivanje invalidskih kolica; Široka ulazna vrata; Ostalo
tr: Erişilebilirlik özellikleri: ADA uyumlu; Tırabzan/tutunma barları; Alçalabilen süspansiyon; Alçak tabanlı; Öncelikli oturma alanı; Tekerlekli sandalye asansörü; Tekerlekli sandalye rampası; Tekerlekli sandalye sabitleme sistemi; Geniş giriş kapısı; Diğer